Florida, session 2026, SB868.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSubsection (22) of section 465.003, Florida 23 Statutes, is amended to read: 24 465.003âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 25 (22)ââPractice of the profession of pharmacyâ includes 26 compounding, dispensing, and consulting concerning contents, 27 therapeutic values, and uses of any medicinal drug; consulting 28 concerning therapeutic values and interactions of patent or 29 proprietary preparations, whether pursuant to prescriptions or 30 in the absence and entirely independent of such prescriptions or 31 orders; and conducting other pharmaceutical services. For 32 purposes of this subsection, the term âother pharmaceutical 33 servicesâ means monitoring the patientâs drug therapy and 34 assisting the patient in the management of his or her drug 35 therapy, and includes reviewing, and making recommendations 36 regarding, the patientâs drug therapy and health care status in 37 communication with the patientâs prescribing health care 38 provider as licensed under chapter 458, chapter 459, chapter 39 461, or chapter 466, or a similar statutory provision in another 40 jurisdiction, or such providerâs agent or such other persons as 41 specifically authorized by the patient; and initiating, 42 modifying, or discontinuing drug therapy for a chronic health 43 condition under a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement. 44 This subsection may not be interpreted to permit an alteration 45 of a prescriberâs directions, the diagnosis or treatment of any 46 disease, the initiation of any drug therapy, the practice of 47 medicine, or the practice of osteopathic medicine, unless 48 otherwise permitted by law or specifically authorized by s. 49 465.1865 or s. 465.1895. The term âpractice of the profession of 50 pharmacyâ also includes any other act, service, operation, 51 research, or transaction incidental to, or forming a part of, 52 any of the foregoing acts, requiring, involving, or employing 53 the science or art of any branch of the pharmaceutical 54 profession, study, or training, and shall expressly permit a 55 pharmacist to transmit information from persons authorized to 56 prescribe medicinal drugs to their patients. The practice of the 57 profession of pharmacy also includes the administration of 58 vaccines to adults pursuant to s. 465.189; the testing or 59 screening for and treatment of minor, nonchronic health 60 conditions pursuant to s. 465.1895; and the preparation of 61 prepackaged drug products in facilities holding Class III 62 institutional pharmacy permits. The term also includes the 63 ordering and evaluating of any laboratory or clinical testing; 64 conducting patient assessments; and modifying, discontinuing, or 65 administering medicinal drugs pursuant to s. 465.0125 by a 66 consultant pharmacist. The term also includes the ordering and 67 administration of the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement 68 Amendments-waived tests, including serology tests authorized by 69 the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) or an 70 equivalent regulatory authorization, subject to the disclaimers 71 and limitations required by the FDA for such tests. 72 Section 2.âSection 465.1894, Florida Statutes, is created 73 to read: 74 465.1894âAdministration of medications.â 75 (1)âA pharmacist, at the direction of a physician licensed 76 under chapter 458 or chapter 459, who meets the following 77 qualifications may administer medications to a patient during a 78 life-threatening emergency event at a Level I or Level II trauma 79 center when delegated to perform such task: 80 (a)âThe pharmacist has completed an accredited postgraduate 81 residency training program; or 82 (b)âThe pharmacist has completed at least 3 years of direct 83 patient care in a hospital setting. 84 85 Each trauma center must retain on record documentation of a 86 pharmacistâs qualification under paragraph (a) or paragraph (b) 87 to perform such tasks before employing the pharmacist to 88 administer medication under this subsection. 89 (2)âThe board shall adopt rules to administer this section. 90 Section 3.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 91 made by this act to section 465.003, Florida Statutes, in a 92 reference thereto, section 465.1901, Florida Statutes, is 93 reenacted to read: 94 465.1901âPractice of orthotics and pedorthics.âThe 95 provisions of chapter 468 relating to orthotics or pedorthics do 96 not apply to any licensed pharmacist or to any person acting 97 under the supervision of a licensed pharmacist. The practice of 98 orthotics or pedorthics by a pharmacist or any of the 99 pharmacistâs employees acting under the supervision of a 100 pharmacist shall be construed to be within the meaning of the 101 term âpractice of the profession of pharmacyâ as defined in s. 102 465.003, and shall be subject to regulation in the same manner 103 as any other pharmacy practice. The Board of Pharmacy shall 104 develop rules regarding the practice of orthotics and pedorthics 105 by a pharmacist. Any pharmacist or person under the supervision 106 of a pharmacist engaged in the practice of orthotics or 107 pedorthics is not precluded from continuing that practice 108 pending adoption of these rules. 109 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 110 made by this act to section 465.003, Florida Statutes, in a 111 reference thereto, paragraph (r) of subsection (1) of section 112 626.8825, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 113 626.8825âPharmacy benefit manager transparency and 114 accountability.â 115 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 116 (r)ââPharmacist servicesâ means products, goods, and 117 services or any combination of products, goods, and services 118 provided as part of the practice of the profession of pharmacy 119 as defined in s. 465.003 or otherwise covered by a pharmacy 120 benefits plan or program. 121 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.